Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1523.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 57A23. Excise fee.(a) Imposition.-- A transportation network company operating within a city of the first class shall remit to the Public Transportation Trust Fund a fee equal to 4.6% of the gross receipts derived from all fares charged to all passengers for prearranged rides that originate in the city.(b) Remittance and deposit.-- The fee required under subsection (a) shall be remitted on a quarterly basis and 123456789101112131415161718 deposited into the Public Transportation Trust Fund.Section 2. Title 66 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2611. Excise fee.(a) Imposition.-- A transportation network company operating outside a city of the first class shall remit to the Public Transportation Trust Fund a fee equal to 6% of the gross receipts derived from all fares charged to all passengers for prearranged rides that originate outside a city of the first class.(b) Remittance and deposit.-- The fee required under subsection (a) shall be remitted on a quarterly basis and deposited into the Public Transportation Trust Fun d. Section 3. Section 1506(c) of Title 74 is amended by adding a paragraph and subsection (e)(1) is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:§ 1506. Fund.* * *(c) Other deposits.--The following shall be deposited into the fund annually:* * *(3.5) Revenues deposited into the fund in accordance with 53 Pa.C.S. § 57A23 (relating to excise fee) and 66 Pa.C.S. § 2611 (relating to excise fee).* * *(e) Program funding amounts.--Subject to available funds, the programs established under this chapter shall be funded annually as follows:(1) For the program established under section 1513 (relating to operating program), the following amounts shall be allocated from the fund:20250HB1523PN1791 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(viii) All revenue deposited into the fund under subsection (c)(3.5).* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1523PN1791 - 3 - 12345